Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
Vocational Training for Prisoners

439.640.
Vocational training program for prisoners — Eligibility for compensation — Commissioner to recommend regulations.

The commissioner of the Department of Corrections may, during the last ninety (90) days of confinement of an inmate committed to a correctional facility maintained and operated by the department, permit an inmate to participate in a vocational training program in the community on a voluntary basis. The vocational training program shall be for the express purpose of permitting the inmate to improve vocational skills to assist the inmate to secure permanent employment prior to release by the department. The inmate shall be eligible to receive compensation while participating in a vocational training program subject to the discharge of his regular financial obligations, to include standard payroll withholding, maintenance, support of dependents, and restitution.

The commissioner shall recommend administrative regulations to implement the provisions of the vocational training program.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 147, § 1; 1982, ch. 344, § 58, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 106, effective July 14, 1992.